src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NI-láí
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:láí^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:láí^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:láí        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:lánta^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:lánta^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:lánta  Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-fraigh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:fraigh^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:fraighe^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:fraigh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:fraitheacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:fraitheacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:fraitheacha    Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-troigh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:troigh^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:troighe^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:troigh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:troithe^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:troithe^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:troithe        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-gualainn
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:gualainn^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:gualainne^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:gualainn       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:guaillí^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:guaillí^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:guaillí        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-goin
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:goin^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:goine^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:goin       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:goine^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:goine^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:goine      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-deoin
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:deoin^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:deona^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:deoin      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:deonta^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:deonta^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:deonta     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-dáil
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:dáil^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:dála^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:dáil       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:dálaí^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:dálaí^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:dálaí      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-daigh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:daigh^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:daighe^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:daigh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:daigheacha^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:daigheacha^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:daigheacha     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-cóir
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:cóir^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:córa^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:cóir       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:córacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:córacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:córacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-sprais
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:sprais^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:spraise^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:sprais     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:spraiseacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:spraiseacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:spraiseacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-roinnt
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:roinnt^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:roinnte^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:roinnt     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:rannta^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:rannta^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:rannta     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-mil
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:mil^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:meala^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:mil        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-goid
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:goid^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:gada^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:goid       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-corcair
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:corcair^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:corcra^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:corcair        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-aifirt
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:aifirt^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:aifeartha^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:aifirt     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-araí
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:araí^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:araíon^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:araí       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:araíonacha^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:araíonacha^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:araíonacha     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ionga
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:ionga^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:iongan^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:ionga      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:ingne^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:ingne^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:ingne      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-deacair
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:deacair^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:deacra^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:deacair        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:deacra^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:deacra^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:deacra     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-deabhaidh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:deabhaidh^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:deafa^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:deabhaidh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:deafa^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:deafa^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:deafa      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-muir
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:muir^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:mara^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:muir       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:mara^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:mara^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:mara       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ceannaghaidh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:ceannaghaidh^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:ceannaithe^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:ceannaghaidh       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:ceannaithe^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:ceannaithe^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:ceannaithe     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-sniodh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:sniodh^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:sneá^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:sniodh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:sneá^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:sneá^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:sneá       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-toimhde
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:toimhde^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:toimhdean^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:toimhde        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-leite
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:leite^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:leitean^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:leite      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-táin
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:táin^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:tána^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:táin       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:táinte^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:táinte^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:táinte     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-díle
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:díle^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:díleann^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:díle       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:dílí^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:dílí^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:dílí       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ára
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:ára^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:árann^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:ára        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:áranna^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:árann^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:áranna     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-lacha
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:lacha^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:lachan^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:lacha      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:lachain^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:lachan^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:lachain        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-caora
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:caora^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:caorach^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:caora      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:caoirigh^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:caorach^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:caoirigh       Voc-initial;
