src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounsIrregular
caora:		NI-caora;
lacha:		NI-lacha;
crannlacha:crann		NI-lacha;
praslacha:pras		NI-lacha;
táin:		NI-táin;
ára:		NI-ára;
deacair:		NI-deacair;
deabhaidh:	NI-deabhaidh;
muir:		NI-muir;
mórmhuir:mór^CB		NI-muir;
ceannaghaidh:		NI-ceannaghaidh;
leite:		NI-leite;
toimhde:		NI-toimhde;
díle:			NI-díle;
ionga:			NI-ionga;
araí:			NI-araí;
aifirt:			NI-aifirt;
corcair:		NI-corcair;
goid:			NI-goid;
mionghoid:mion^CB			NI-goid;
sniodh:			NI-sniodh;
mil:		NI-mil;
roinnt:		NI-roinnt;
ilroinnt:il		NI-roinnt;
cionroinnt:cion		NI-roinnt;
sprais:			NI-sprais;
cóir:		NI-cóir;
daigh:		NI-daigh;
dáil:		NI-dáil;
deoin:		NI-deoin;
goin:		NI-goin;
gualainn:	NI-gualainn;
troigh:		NI-troigh;
fraigh:		NI-fraigh;
láí:		NI-láí;
